Illinois, session 104th, HB1925.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Education Prioritization Act. 6    Section 5. Educational appropriations. Beginning with 7fiscal year 2026 and in each fiscal year thereafter, subject 8to the provisions of Section 10 of this Act, the General 9Assembly shall appropriate for the evidence-based funding 10formula set forth in Section 18-8.15 of the School Code an 11amount that is equal to or exceeds the sum of: (i) the total 12amount appropriated for the evidence-based funding formula set 13forth in Section 18-8.15 of the School Code during the fiscal 14year immediately preceding the fiscal year for which the 15appropriation is being made; and (ii) 51% of total new general 16funds available for spending from estimated growth in revenues 17and funds available because of budgeted program growth and 18decline in the fiscal year for which the appropriation is 19being made; but in no event shall the sum be less than the 20percentage required under Section 10 of this Act. The 21Commission on Government Forecasting and Accountability shall 22certify the amount of total new general funds available for 23spending.   HB1925- 2 -LRB104 09564 LNS 19627 b1    Section 10. State and federal funding. State funding for 2the evidence-based funding formula set forth in Section 318-8.15 of the School Code shall be appropriated pursuant to 4Section 5 of this Act so that the sum of State and federal 5spending represents no less than 51% of the total revenues 6available from local, State, and federal sources for 7elementary and secondary education programs for the current 8fiscal year, as estimated by the State Superintendent of 9Education. 10    Section 15. Continuing appropriation. If the General 11Assembly fails to make appropriations to the State Board of 12Education in fiscal year 2026 or in any fiscal year thereafter 13sufficient to fund the evidence-based funding formula set 14forth in Section 18-8.15 of the School Code, this Act shall 15constitute a continuing appropriation of all amounts necessary 16for that purpose. 17    Section 20. Governor's budget. Beginning with fiscal year 182027 and in each fiscal year thereafter, the Governor shall 19include in his or her annual budget an allocation for 20elementary and secondary education that conforms to the 21provisions of this Act. 22    Section 85. The School Code is amended by changing   HB1925- 3 -LRB104 09564 LNS 19627 b1Sections 2-3.28 and 18-8.15 as follows: 2    (105 ILCS 5/2-3.28)  (from Ch. 122, par. 2-3.28)3    Sec. 2-3.28. Rules and regulations of budget and 4accounting systems. To prescribe rules and regulations 5defining what shall constitute a budget and accounting system 6required under this Act. The rules and regulations shall 7prescribe the minimum extent of verification, the type of 8audit, the extent of the audit report and shall require 9compliance with statutory requirements and standards and such 10requirements as the State Board of Education deems necessary 11for an adequate budget and accounting system. For the 122025-2026 school year and thereafter, the rules and 13regulations shall prescribe a system for accounting for 14revenues and expenditures at the individual school level that 15includes, without limitation, the following:16        (1) accounting for expenditures for school 17    administration, regular instruction, special education 18    instruction, instructional programs for children of 19    limited English-speaking ability, instructional support 20    services, and pupil support services;21        (2) salary expenditures reflecting actual staff 22    salaries at each school;23        (3) accounting for operations, including 24    non-instructional pupil services, facilities, and business 25    services; and  HB1925- 4 -LRB104 09564 LNS 19627 b1        (4) such other requirements as the State Board of 2    Education deems necessary to provide for a uniform and 3    transparent system of accounting at the school level. 4(Source: P.A. 81-1508.) 5    (105 ILCS 5/18-8.15)6    Sec. 18-8.15. Evidence-Based Funding for student success 7for the 2017-2018 and subsequent school years. 8    (a) General provisions. 9        (1) The purpose of this Section is to ensure that, by 10    June 30, 2027 and beyond, this State has a kindergarten 11    through grade 12 public education system with the capacity 12    to ensure the educational development of all persons to 13    the limits of their capacities in accordance with Section 14    1 of Article X of the Constitution of the State of 15    Illinois. To accomplish that objective, this Section 16    creates a method of funding public education that is 17    evidence-based; is sufficient to ensure every student 18    receives a meaningful opportunity to learn irrespective of 19    race, ethnicity, sexual orientation, gender, or 20    community-income level; and is sustainable and 21    predictable. When fully funded under this Section, every 22    school shall have the resources, based on what the 23    evidence indicates is needed, to: 24            (A) provide all students with a high quality 25        education that offers the academic, enrichment, social   HB1925- 5 -LRB104 09564 LNS 19627 b1        and emotional support, technical, and career-focused 2        programs that will allow them to become competitive 3        workers, responsible parents, productive citizens of 4        this State, and active members of our national 5        democracy;6            (B) ensure all students receive the education they 7        need to graduate from high school with the skills 8        required to pursue post-secondary education and 9        training for a rewarding career;10            (C) reduce, with a goal of eliminating, the 11        achievement gap between at-risk and non-at-risk 12        students by raising the performance of at-risk 13        students and not by reducing standards; and14            (D) ensure this State satisfies its obligation to 15        assume the primary responsibility to fund public 16        education and simultaneously relieve the 17        disproportionate burden placed on local property taxes 18        to fund schools. 19        (2) The Evidence-Based Funding formula under this 20    Section shall be applied to all Organizational Units in 21    this State. The Evidence-Based Funding formula outlined in 22    this Act is based on the formula outlined in Senate Bill 1 23    of the 100th General Assembly, as passed by both 24    legislative chambers. As further defined and described in 25    this Section, there are 4 major components of the 26    Evidence-Based Funding model:   HB1925- 6 -LRB104 09564 LNS 19627 b1            (A) First, the model calculates a unique Adequacy 2        Target for each Organizational Unit in this State that 3        considers the costs to implement research-based 4        activities, the unit's student demographics, and 5        regional wage differences.6            (B) Second, the model calculates each 7        Organizational Unit's Local Capacity, or the amount 8        each Organizational Unit is assumed to contribute 9        toward its Adequacy Target from local resources.10            (C) Third, the model calculates how much funding 11        the State currently contributes to the Organizational 12        Unit and adds that to the unit's Local Capacity to 13        determine the unit's overall current adequacy of 14        funding.15            (D) Finally, the model's distribution method 16        allocates new State funding to those Organizational 17        Units that are least well-funded, considering both 18        Local Capacity and State funding, in relation to their 19        Adequacy Target. 20        (3) An Organizational Unit receiving any funding under 21    this Section may apply those funds to any fund so received 22    for which that Organizational Unit is authorized to make 23    expenditures by law.24        (4) As used in this Section, the following terms shall 25    have the meanings ascribed in this paragraph (4): 26        "Adequacy Target" is defined in paragraph (1) of   HB1925- 7 -LRB104 09564 LNS 19627 b1    subsection (b) of this Section.2        "Adjusted EAV" is defined in paragraph (4) of 3    subsection (d) of this Section. 4        "Adjusted Local Capacity Target" is defined in 5    paragraph (3) of subsection (c) of this Section.6        "Adjusted Operating Tax Rate" means a tax rate for all 7    Organizational Units, for which the State Superintendent 8    shall calculate and subtract for the Operating Tax Rate a 9    transportation rate based on total expenses for 10    transportation services under this Code, as reported on 11    the most recent Annual Financial Report in Pupil 12    Transportation Services, function 2550 in both the 13    Education and Transportation funds and functions 4110 and 14    4120 in the Transportation fund, less any corresponding 15    fiscal year State of Illinois scheduled payments excluding 16    net adjustments for prior years for regular, vocational, 17    or special education transportation reimbursement pursuant 18    to Section 29-5 or subsection (b) of Section 14-13.01 of 19    this Code divided by the Adjusted EAV. If an 20    Organizational Unit's corresponding fiscal year State of 21    Illinois scheduled payments excluding net adjustments for 22    prior years for regular, vocational, or special education 23    transportation reimbursement pursuant to Section 29-5 or 24    subsection (b) of Section 14-13.01 of this Code exceed the 25    total transportation expenses, as defined in this 26    paragraph, no transportation rate shall be subtracted from   HB1925- 8 -LRB104 09564 LNS 19627 b1    the Operating Tax Rate. 2        "Allocation Rate" is defined in paragraph (3) of 3    subsection (g) of this Section.4        "Alternative School" means a public school that is 5    created and operated by a regional superintendent of 6    schools and approved by the State Board.7        "Applicable Tax Rate" is defined in paragraph (1) of 8    subsection (d) of this Section.9        "Assessment" means any of those benchmark, progress 10    monitoring, formative, diagnostic, and other assessments, 11    in addition to the State accountability assessment, that 12    assist teachers' needs in understanding the skills and 13    meeting the needs of the students they serve.14        "Assistant principal" means a school administrator 15    duly endorsed to be employed as an assistant principal in 16    this State.17        "At-risk student" means a student who is at risk of 18    not meeting the Illinois Learning Standards or not 19    graduating from elementary or high school and who 20    demonstrates a need for vocational support or social 21    services beyond that provided by the regular school 22    program. All students included in an Organizational Unit's 23    Low-Income Count, as well as all English learner and 24    disabled students attending the Organizational Unit, shall 25    be considered at-risk students under this Section.26        "Average Student Enrollment" or "ASE" for fiscal year   HB1925- 9 -LRB104 09564 LNS 19627 b1    2018 means, for an Organizational Unit, the greater of the 2    average number of students (grades K through 12) reported 3    to the State Board as enrolled in the Organizational Unit 4    on October 1 in the immediately preceding school year, 5    plus the pre-kindergarten students who receive special 6    education services of 2 or more hours a day as reported to 7    the State Board on December 1 in the immediately preceding 8    school year, or the average number of students (grades K 9    through 12) reported to the State Board as enrolled in the 10    Organizational Unit on October 1, plus the 11    pre-kindergarten students who receive special education 12    services of 2 or more hours a day as reported to the State 13    Board on December 1, for each of the immediately preceding 14    3 school years. For fiscal year 2019 and each subsequent 15    fiscal year, "Average Student Enrollment" or "ASE" means, 16    for an Organizational Unit, the greater of the average 17    number of students (grades K through 12) reported to the 18    State Board as enrolled in the Organizational Unit on 19    October 1 and March 1 in the immediately preceding school 20    year, plus the pre-kindergarten students who receive 21    special education services as reported to the State Board 22    on October 1 and March 1 in the immediately preceding 23    school year, or the average number of students (grades K 24    through 12) reported to the State Board as enrolled in the 25    Organizational Unit on October 1 and March 1, plus the 26    pre-kindergarten students who receive special education   HB1925- 10 -LRB104 09564 LNS 19627 b1    services as reported to the State Board on October 1 and 2    March 1, for each of the immediately preceding 3 school 3    years. For the purposes of this definition, "enrolled in 4    the Organizational Unit" means the number of students 5    reported to the State Board who are enrolled in schools 6    within the Organizational Unit that the student attends or 7    would attend if not placed or transferred to another 8    school or program to receive needed services. For the 9    purposes of calculating "ASE", all students, grades K 10    through 12, excluding those attending kindergarten for a 11    half day and students attending an alternative education 12    program operated by a regional office of education or 13    intermediate service center, shall be counted as 1.0. All 14    students attending kindergarten for a half day shall be 15    counted as 0.5, unless in 2017 by June 15 or by March 1 in 16    subsequent years, the school district reports to the State 17    Board of Education the intent to implement full-day 18    kindergarten district-wide for all students, then all 19    students attending kindergarten shall be counted as 1.0. 20    Special education pre-kindergarten students shall be 21    counted as 0.5 each. If the State Board does not collect or 22    has not collected both an October 1 and March 1 enrollment 23    count by grade or a December 1 collection of special 24    education pre-kindergarten students as of August 31, 2017 25    (the effective date of Public Act 100-465), it shall 26    establish such collection for all future years. For any   HB1925- 11 -LRB104 09564 LNS 19627 b1    year in which a count by grade level was collected only 2    once, that count shall be used as the single count 3    available for computing a 3-year average ASE. Funding for 4    programs operated by a regional office of education or an 5    intermediate service center must be calculated using the 6    Evidence-Based Funding formula under this Section for the 7    2019-2020 school year and each subsequent school year 8    until separate adequacy formulas are developed and adopted 9    for each type of program. ASE for a program operated by a 10    regional office of education or an intermediate service 11    center must be determined by the March 1 enrollment for 12    the program. For the 2019-2020 school year, the ASE used 13    in the calculation must be the first-year ASE and, in that 14    year only, the assignment of students served by a regional 15    office of education or intermediate service center shall 16    not result in a reduction of the March enrollment for any 17    school district. For the 2020-2021 school year, the ASE 18    must be the greater of the current-year ASE or the 2-year 19    average ASE. Beginning with the 2021-2022 school year, the 20    ASE must be the greater of the current-year ASE or the 21    3-year average ASE. School districts shall submit the data 22    for the ASE calculation to the State Board within 45 days 23    of the dates required in this Section for submission of 24    enrollment data in order for it to be included in the ASE 25    calculation. For fiscal year 2018 only, the ASE 26    calculation shall include only enrollment taken on October   HB1925- 12 -LRB104 09564 LNS 19627 b1    1. In recognition of the impact of COVID-19, the 2    definition of "Average Student Enrollment" or "ASE" shall 3    be adjusted for calculations under this Section for fiscal 4    years 2022 through 2024. For fiscal years 2022 through 5    2024, the enrollment used in the calculation of ASE 6    representing the 2020-2021 school year shall be the 7    greater of the enrollment for the 2020-2021 school year or 8    the 2019-2020 school year.9        "Base Funding Guarantee" is defined in paragraph (10) 10    of subsection (g) of this Section. 11        "Base Funding Minimum" is defined in subsection (e) of 12    this Section.13        "Base Tax Year" means the property tax levy year used 14    to calculate the Budget Year allocation of primary State 15    aid.16        "Base Tax Year's Extension" means the product of the 17    equalized assessed valuation utilized by the county clerk 18    in the Base Tax Year multiplied by the limiting rate as 19    calculated by the county clerk and defined in PTELL.20        "Bilingual Education Allocation" means the amount of 21    an Organizational Unit's final Adequacy Target 22    attributable to bilingual education divided by the 23    Organizational Unit's final Adequacy Target, the product 24    of which shall be multiplied by the amount of new funding 25    received pursuant to this Section. An Organizational 26    Unit's final Adequacy Target attributable to bilingual   HB1925- 13 -LRB104 09564 LNS 19627 b1    education shall include all additional investments in 2    English learner students' adequacy elements.3        "Budget Year" means the school year for which primary 4    State aid is calculated and awarded under this Section. 5        "Central office" means individual administrators and 6    support service personnel charged with managing the 7    instructional programs, business and operations, and 8    security of the Organizational Unit.9        "Comparable Wage Index" or "CWI" means a regional cost 10    differentiation metric that measures systemic, regional 11    variations in the salaries of college graduates who are 12    not educators. The CWI utilized for this Section shall, 13    for the first 3 years of Evidence-Based Funding 14    implementation, be the CWI initially developed by the 15    National Center for Education Statistics, as most recently 16    updated by Texas A & M University. In the fourth and 17    subsequent years of Evidence-Based Funding implementation, 18    the State Superintendent shall re-determine the CWI using 19    a similar methodology to that identified in the Texas A & M 20    University study, with adjustments made no less frequently 21    than once every 5 years.22        "Computer technology and equipment" means computers 23    servers, notebooks, network equipment, copiers, printers, 24    instructional software, security software, curriculum 25    management courseware, and other similar materials and 26    equipment.   HB1925- 14 -LRB104 09564 LNS 19627 b1        "Computer technology and equipment investment 2    allocation" means the final Adequacy Target amount of an 3    Organizational Unit assigned to Tier 1 or Tier 2 in the 4    prior school year attributable to the additional $285.50 5    per student computer technology and equipment investment 6    grant divided by the Organizational Unit's final Adequacy 7    Target, the result of which shall be multiplied by the 8    amount of new funding received pursuant to this Section. 9    An Organizational Unit assigned to a Tier 1 or Tier 2 final 10    Adequacy Target attributable to the received computer 11    technology and equipment investment grant shall include 12    all additional investments in computer technology and 13    equipment adequacy elements. 14        "Core subject" means mathematics; science; reading, 15    English, writing, and language arts; history and social 16    studies; world languages; and subjects taught as Advanced 17    Placement in high schools.18        "Core teacher" means a regular classroom teacher in 19    elementary schools and teachers of a core subject in 20    middle and high schools.21        "Core Intervention teacher (tutor)" means a licensed 22    teacher providing one-on-one or small group tutoring to 23    students struggling to meet proficiency in core subjects.24        "CPPRT" means corporate personal property replacement 25    tax funds paid to an Organizational Unit during the 26    calendar year one year before the calendar year in which a   HB1925- 15 -LRB104 09564 LNS 19627 b1    school year begins, pursuant to "An Act in relation to the 2    abolition of ad valorem personal property tax and the 3    replacement of revenues lost thereby, and amending and 4    repealing certain Acts and parts of Acts in connection 5    therewith", certified August 14, 1979, as amended (Public 6    Act 81-1st S.S.-1).7        "EAV" means equalized assessed valuation as defined in 8    paragraph (2) of subsection (d) of this Section and 9    calculated in accordance with paragraph (3) of subsection 10    (d) of this Section.11        "ECI" means the Bureau of Labor Statistics' national 12    employment cost index for civilian workers in educational 13    services in elementary and secondary schools on a 14    cumulative basis for the 12-month calendar year preceding 15    the fiscal year of the Evidence-Based Funding calculation.16        "EIS Data" means the employment information system 17    data maintained by the State Board on educators within 18    Organizational Units.19        "Employee benefits" means health, dental, and vision 20    insurance offered to employees of an Organizational Unit, 21    the costs associated with the statutorily required payment 22    of the normal cost of the Organizational Unit's teacher 23    pensions, Social Security employer contributions, and 24    Illinois Municipal Retirement Fund employer contributions.25        "English learner" or "EL" means a child included in 26    the definition of "English learners" under Section 14C-2   HB1925- 16 -LRB104 09564 LNS 19627 b1    of this Code participating in a program of transitional 2    bilingual education or a transitional program of 3    instruction meeting the requirements and program 4    application procedures of Article 14C of this Code. For 5    the purposes of collecting the number of EL students 6    enrolled, the same collection and calculation methodology 7    as defined above for "ASE" shall apply to English 8    learners, with the exception that EL student enrollment 9    shall include students in grades pre-kindergarten through 10    12.11        "Essential Elements" means those elements, resources, 12    and educational programs that have been identified through 13    academic research as necessary to improve student success, 14    improve academic performance, close achievement gaps, and 15    provide for other per student costs related to the 16    delivery and leadership of the Organizational Unit, as 17    well as the maintenance and operations of the unit, and 18    which are specified in paragraph (2) of subsection (b) of 19    this Section.20        "Evidence-Based Funding" means State funding provided 21    to an Organizational Unit pursuant to this Section.22        "Extended day" means academic and enrichment programs 23    provided to students outside the regular school day before 24    and after school or during non-instructional times during 25    the school day.26        "Extension Limitation Ratio" means a numerical ratio   HB1925- 17 -LRB104 09564 LNS 19627 b1    in which the numerator is the Base Tax Year's Extension 2    and the denominator is the Preceding Tax Year's Extension.3        "Final Percent of Adequacy" is defined in paragraph 4    (4) of subsection (f) of this Section.5        "Final Resources" is defined in paragraph (3) of 6    subsection (f) of this Section.7        "Full-time equivalent" or "FTE" means the full-time 8    equivalency compensation for staffing the relevant 9    position at an Organizational Unit.10        "Funding Gap" is defined in paragraph (1) of 11    subsection (g).12        "Hybrid District" means a partial elementary unit 13    district created pursuant to Article 11E of this Code.14        "Instructional assistant" means a core or special 15    education, non-licensed employee who assists a teacher in 16    the classroom and provides academic support to students. 17        "Instructional facilitator" means a qualified teacher 18    or licensed teacher leader who facilitates and coaches 19    continuous improvement in classroom instruction; provides 20    instructional support to teachers in the elements of 21    research-based instruction or demonstrates the alignment 22    of instruction with curriculum standards and assessment 23    tools; develops or coordinates instructional programs or 24    strategies; develops and implements training; chooses 25    standards-based instructional materials; provides 26    teachers with an understanding of current research; serves   HB1925- 18 -LRB104 09564 LNS 19627 b1    as a mentor, site coach, curriculum specialist, or lead 2    teacher; or otherwise works with fellow teachers, in 3    collaboration, to use data to improve instructional 4    practice or develop model lessons.5        "Instructional materials" means relevant 6    instructional materials for student instruction, 7    including, but not limited to, textbooks, consumable 8    workbooks, laboratory equipment, library books, and other 9    similar materials.10        "Laboratory School" means a public school that is 11    created and operated by a public university and approved 12    by the State Board.13        "Librarian" means a teacher with an endorsement as a 14    library information specialist or another individual whose 15    primary responsibility is overseeing library resources 16    within an Organizational Unit.17        "Limiting rate for Hybrid Districts" means the 18    combined elementary school and high school limiting rates. 19        "Local Capacity" is defined in paragraph (1) of 20    subsection (c) of this Section.21        "Local Capacity Percentage" is defined in subparagraph 22    (A) of paragraph (2) of subsection (c) of this Section.23        "Local Capacity Ratio" is defined in subparagraph (B) 24    of paragraph (2) of subsection (c) of this Section.25        "Local Capacity Target" is defined in paragraph (2) of 26    subsection (c) of this Section.  HB1925- 19 -LRB104 09564 LNS 19627 b1        "Low-Income Count" means, for an Organizational Unit 2    in a fiscal year, the higher of the average number of 3    students for the prior school year or the immediately 4    preceding 3 school years who, as of July 1 of the 5    immediately preceding fiscal year (as determined by the 6    Department of Human Services), are eligible for at least 7    one of the following low-income programs: Medicaid, the 8    Children's Health Insurance Program, Temporary Assistance 9    for Needy Families (TANF), or the Supplemental Nutrition 10    Assistance Program, excluding pupils who are eligible for 11    services provided by the Department of Children and Family 12    Services. Until such time that grade level low-income 13    populations become available, grade level low-income 14    populations shall be determined by applying the low-income 15    percentage to total student enrollments by grade level. 16    The low-income percentage is determined by dividing the 17    Low-Income Count by the Average Student Enrollment. The 18    low-income percentage for a regional office of education 19    or an intermediate service center operating one or more 20    alternative education programs must be set to the weighted 21    average of the low-income percentages of all of the school 22    districts in the service region. The weighted low-income 23    percentage is the result of multiplying the low-income 24    percentage of each school district served by the regional 25    office of education or intermediate service center by each 26    school district's Average Student Enrollment, summarizing   HB1925- 20 -LRB104 09564 LNS 19627 b1    those products and dividing the total by the total Average 2    Student Enrollment for the service region.3        "Maintenance and operations" means custodial services, 4    facility and ground maintenance, facility operations, 5    facility security, routine facility repairs, and other 6    similar services and functions.7        "Minimum Funding Level" is defined in paragraph (9) of 8    subsection (g) of this Section.9        "New Property Tax Relief Pool Funds" means, for any 10    given fiscal year, all State funds appropriated under 11    Section 2-3.170 of this Code. 12        "New State Funds" means, for a given school year, all 13    State funds appropriated for Evidence-Based Funding in 14    excess of the amount needed to fund the Base Funding 15    Minimum for all Organizational Units in that school year.16        "Nurse" means an individual licensed as a certified 17    school nurse, in accordance with the rules established for 18    nursing services by the State Board, who is an employee of 19    and is available to provide health care-related services 20    for students of an Organizational Unit.21        "Operating Tax Rate" means the rate utilized in the 22    previous year to extend property taxes for all purposes, 23    except Bond and Interest, Summer School, Rent, Capital 24    Improvement, and Vocational Education Building purposes. 25    For Hybrid Districts, the Operating Tax Rate shall be the 26    combined elementary and high school rates utilized in the   HB1925- 21 -LRB104 09564 LNS 19627 b1    previous year to extend property taxes for all purposes, 2    except Bond and Interest, Summer School, Rent, Capital 3    Improvement, and Vocational Education Building purposes. 4        "Organizational Unit" means a Laboratory School or any 5    public school district that is recognized as such by the 6    State Board and that contains elementary schools typically 7    serving kindergarten through 5th grades, middle schools 8    typically serving 6th through 8th grades, high schools 9    typically serving 9th through 12th grades, a program 10    established under Section 2-3.66 or 2-3.41, or a program 11    operated by a regional office of education or an 12    intermediate service center under Article 13A or 13B. The 13    General Assembly acknowledges that the actual grade levels 14    served by a particular Organizational Unit may vary 15    slightly from what is typical.16        "Organizational Unit CWI" is determined by calculating 17    the CWI in the region and original county in which an 18    Organizational Unit's primary administrative office is 19    located as set forth in this paragraph, provided that if 20    the Organizational Unit CWI as calculated in accordance 21    with this paragraph is less than 0.9, the Organizational 22    Unit CWI shall be increased to 0.9. Each county's current 23    CWI value shall be adjusted based on the CWI value of that 24    county's neighboring Illinois counties, to create a 25    "weighted adjusted index value". This shall be calculated 26    by summing the CWI values of all of a county's adjacent   HB1925- 22 -LRB104 09564 LNS 19627 b1    Illinois counties and dividing by the number of adjacent 2    Illinois counties, then taking the weighted value of the 3    original county's CWI value and the adjacent Illinois 4    county average. To calculate this weighted value, if the 5    number of adjacent Illinois counties is greater than 2, 6    the original county's CWI value will be weighted at 0.25 7    and the adjacent Illinois county average will be weighted 8    at 0.75. If the number of adjacent Illinois counties is 2, 9    the original county's CWI value will be weighted at 0.33 10    and the adjacent Illinois county average will be weighted 11    at 0.66. The greater of the county's current CWI value and 12    its weighted adjusted index value shall be used as the 13    Organizational Unit CWI.14        "Preceding Tax Year" means the property tax levy year 15    immediately preceding the Base Tax Year.16        "Preceding Tax Year's Extension" means the product of 17    the equalized assessed valuation utilized by the county 18    clerk in the Preceding Tax Year multiplied by the 19    Operating Tax Rate. 20        "Preliminary Percent of Adequacy" is defined in 21    paragraph (2) of subsection (f) of this Section.22        "Preliminary Resources" is defined in paragraph (2) of 23    subsection (f) of this Section.24        "Principal" means a school administrator duly endorsed 25    to be employed as a principal in this State.26        "Professional development" means training programs for   HB1925- 23 -LRB104 09564 LNS 19627 b1    licensed staff in schools, including, but not limited to, 2    programs that assist in implementing new curriculum 3    programs, provide data focused or academic assessment data 4    training to help staff identify a student's weaknesses and 5    strengths, target interventions, improve instruction, 6    encompass instructional strategies for English learner, 7    gifted, or at-risk students, address inclusivity, cultural 8    sensitivity, or implicit bias, or otherwise provide 9    professional support for licensed staff.10        "Prototypical" means 450 special education 11    pre-kindergarten and kindergarten through grade 5 students 12    for an elementary school, 450 grade 6 through 8 students 13    for a middle school, and 600 grade 9 through 12 students 14    for a high school.15        "PTELL" means the Property Tax Extension Limitation 16    Law.17        "PTELL EAV" is defined in paragraph (4) of subsection 18    (d) of this Section.19        "Pupil support staff" means a nurse, psychologist, 20    social worker, family liaison personnel, or other staff 21    member who provides support to at-risk or struggling 22    students.23        "Real Receipts" is defined in paragraph (1) of 24    subsection (d) of this Section.25        "Regionalization Factor" means, for a particular 26    Organizational Unit, the figure derived by dividing the   HB1925- 24 -LRB104 09564 LNS 19627 b1    Organizational Unit CWI by the Statewide Weighted CWI.2        "School counselor" means a licensed school counselor 3    who provides guidance and counseling support for students 4    within an Organizational Unit.5        "School site staff" means the primary school secretary 6    and any additional clerical personnel assigned to a 7    school.8        "Special education" means special educational 9    facilities and services, as defined in Section 14-1.08 of 10    this Code.11        "Special Education Allocation" means the amount of an 12    Organizational Unit's final Adequacy Target attributable 13    to special education divided by the Organizational Unit's 14    final Adequacy Target, the product of which shall be 15    multiplied by the amount of new funding received pursuant 16    to this Section. An Organizational Unit's final Adequacy 17    Target attributable to special education shall include all 18    special education investment adequacy elements. 19        "Specialist teacher" means a teacher who provides 20    instruction in subject areas not included in core 21    subjects, including, but not limited to, art, music, 22    physical education, health, driver education, 23    career-technical education, and such other subject areas 24    as may be mandated by State law or provided by an 25    Organizational Unit.26        "Specially Funded Unit" means an Alternative School,   HB1925- 25 -LRB104 09564 LNS 19627 b1    safe school, Department of Juvenile Justice school, 2    special education cooperative or entity recognized by the 3    State Board as a special education cooperative, 4    State-approved charter school, or alternative learning 5    opportunities program that received direct funding from 6    the State Board during the 2016-2017 school year through 7    any of the funding sources included within the calculation 8    of the Base Funding Minimum or Glenwood Academy.9        "Supplemental Grant Funding" means supplemental 10    general State aid funding received by an Organizational 11    Unit during the 2016-2017 school year pursuant to 12    subsection (H) of Section 18-8.05 of this Code (now 13    repealed). 14        "State Adequacy Level" is the sum of the Adequacy 15    Targets of all Organizational Units.16        "State Board" means the State Board of Education.17        "State Superintendent" means the State Superintendent 18    of Education.19        "Statewide Weighted CWI" means a figure determined by 20    multiplying each Organizational Unit CWI times the ASE for 21    that Organizational Unit creating a weighted value, 22    summing all Organizational Units' weighted values, and 23    dividing by the total ASE of all Organizational Units, 24    thereby creating an average weighted index.25        "Student activities" means non-credit producing 26    after-school programs, including, but not limited to,   HB1925- 26 -LRB104 09564 LNS 19627 b1    clubs, bands, sports, and other activities authorized by 2    the school board of the Organizational Unit.3        "Substitute teacher" means an individual teacher or 4    teaching assistant who is employed by an Organizational 5    Unit and is temporarily serving the Organizational Unit on 6    a per diem or per period-assignment basis to replace 7    another staff member.8        "Summer school" means academic and enrichment programs 9    provided to students during the summer months outside of 10    the regular school year.11        "Supervisory aide" means a non-licensed staff member 12    who helps in supervising students of an Organizational 13    Unit, but does so outside of the classroom, in situations 14    such as, but not limited to, monitoring hallways and 15    playgrounds, supervising lunchrooms, or supervising 16    students when being transported in buses serving the 17    Organizational Unit.18        "Target Ratio" is defined in paragraph (4) of 19    subsection (g).20        "Tier 1", "Tier 2", "Tier 3", and "Tier 4" are defined 21    in paragraph (3) of subsection (g).22        "Tier 1 Aggregate Funding", "Tier 2 Aggregate 23    Funding", "Tier 3 Aggregate Funding", and "Tier 4 24    Aggregate Funding" are defined in paragraph (1) of 25    subsection (g). 26    (b) Adequacy Target calculation.   HB1925- 27 -LRB104 09564 LNS 19627 b1        (1) Each Organizational Unit's Adequacy Target is the 2    sum of the Organizational Unit's cost of providing 3    Essential Elements, as calculated in accordance with this 4    subsection (b), with the salary amounts in the Essential 5    Elements multiplied by a Regionalization Factor calculated 6    pursuant to paragraph (3) of this subsection (b).7        (2) The Essential Elements are attributable on a pro 8    rata basis related to defined subgroups of the ASE of each 9    Organizational Unit as specified in this paragraph (2), 10    with investments and FTE positions pro rata funded based 11    on ASE counts in excess of or less than the thresholds set 12    forth in this paragraph (2). The method for calculating 13    attributable pro rata costs and the defined subgroups 14    thereto are as follows: 15            (A) Core class size investments. Each 16        Organizational Unit shall receive the funding required 17        to support that number of FTE core teacher positions 18        as is needed to keep the respective class sizes of the 19        Organizational Unit to the following maximum numbers:20                (i) For grades kindergarten through 3, the 21            Organizational Unit shall receive funding required 22            to support one FTE core teacher position for every 23            15 Low-Income Count students in those grades and 24            one FTE core teacher position for every 20 25            non-Low-Income Count students in those grades.26                (ii) For grades 4 through 12, the   HB1925- 28 -LRB104 09564 LNS 19627 b1            Organizational Unit shall receive funding required 2            to support one FTE core teacher position for every 3            20 Low-Income Count students in those grades and 4            one FTE core teacher position for every 25 5            non-Low-Income Count students in those grades.6            The number of non-Low-Income Count students in a 7        grade shall be determined by subtracting the 8        Low-Income students in that grade from the ASE of the 9        Organizational Unit for that grade.10            (B) Specialist teacher investments. Each 11        Organizational Unit shall receive the funding needed 12        to cover that number of FTE specialist teacher 13        positions that correspond to the following 14        percentages: 15                (i) if the Organizational Unit operates an 16            elementary or middle school, then 20.00% of the 17            number of the Organizational Unit's core teachers, 18            as determined under subparagraph (A) of this 19            paragraph (2); and20                (ii) if such Organizational Unit operates a 21            high school, then 33.33% of the number of the 22            Organizational Unit's core teachers. 23            (C) Instructional facilitator investments. Each 24        Organizational Unit shall receive the funding needed 25        to cover one FTE instructional facilitator position 26        for every 200 combined ASE of pre-kindergarten   HB1925- 29 -LRB104 09564 LNS 19627 b1        children with disabilities and all kindergarten 2        through grade 12 students of the Organizational Unit.3            (D) Core intervention teacher (tutor) investments. 4        Each Organizational Unit shall receive the funding 5        needed to cover one FTE teacher position for each 6        prototypical elementary, middle, and high school.7            (E) Substitute teacher investments. Each 8        Organizational Unit shall receive the funding needed 9        to cover substitute teacher costs that is equal to 10        5.70% of the minimum pupil attendance days required 11        under Section 10-19 of this Code for all full-time 12        equivalent core, specialist, and intervention 13        teachers, school nurses, special education teachers 14        and instructional assistants, instructional 15        facilitators, and summer school and extended day 16        teacher positions, as determined under this paragraph 17        (2), at a salary rate of 33.33% of the average salary 18        for grade K through 12 teachers and 33.33% of the 19        average salary of each instructional assistant 20        position.21            (F) Core school counselor investments. Each 22        Organizational Unit shall receive the funding needed 23        to cover one FTE school counselor for each 450 24        combined ASE of pre-kindergarten children with 25        disabilities and all kindergarten through grade 5 26        students, plus one FTE school counselor for each 250   HB1925- 30 -LRB104 09564 LNS 19627 b1        grades 6 through 8 ASE middle school students, plus 2        one FTE school counselor for each 250 grades 9 through 3        12 ASE high school students.4            (G) Nurse investments. Each Organizational Unit 5        shall receive the funding needed to cover one FTE 6        nurse for each 750 combined ASE of pre-kindergarten 7        children with disabilities and all kindergarten 8        through grade 12 students across all grade levels it 9        serves.10            (H) Supervisory aide investments. Each 11        Organizational Unit shall receive the funding needed 12        to cover one FTE for each 225 combined ASE of 13        pre-kindergarten children with disabilities and all 14        kindergarten through grade 5 students, plus one FTE 15        for each 225 ASE middle school students, plus one FTE 16        for each 200 ASE high school students.17            (I) Librarian investments. Each Organizational 18        Unit shall receive the funding needed to cover one FTE 19        librarian for each prototypical elementary school, 20        middle school, and high school and one FTE aide or 21        media technician for every 300 combined ASE of 22        pre-kindergarten children with disabilities and all 23        kindergarten through grade 12 students.24            (J) Principal investments. Each Organizational 25        Unit shall receive the funding needed to cover one FTE 26        principal position for each prototypical elementary   HB1925- 31 -LRB104 09564 LNS 19627 b1        school, plus one FTE principal position for each 2        prototypical middle school, plus one FTE principal 3        position for each prototypical high school.4            (K) Assistant principal investments. Each 5        Organizational Unit shall receive the funding needed 6        to cover one FTE assistant principal position for each 7        prototypical elementary school, plus one FTE assistant 8        principal position for each prototypical middle 9        school, plus one FTE assistant principal position for 10        each prototypical high school.11            (L) School site staff investments. Each 12        Organizational Unit shall receive the funding needed 13        for one FTE position for each 225 ASE of 14        pre-kindergarten children with disabilities and all 15        kindergarten through grade 5 students, plus one FTE 16        position for each 225 ASE middle school students, plus 17        one FTE position for each 200 ASE high school 18        students.19            (M) Gifted investments. Each Organizational Unit 20        shall receive $40 per kindergarten through grade 12 21        ASE.22            (N) Professional development investments. Each 23        Organizational Unit shall receive $125 per student of 24        the combined ASE of pre-kindergarten children with 25        disabilities and all kindergarten through grade 12 26        students for trainers and other professional   HB1925- 32 -LRB104 09564 LNS 19627 b1        development-related expenses for supplies and 2        materials.3            (O) Instructional material investments. Each 4        Organizational Unit shall receive $190 per student of 5        the combined ASE of pre-kindergarten children with 6        disabilities and all kindergarten through grade 12 7        students to cover instructional material costs.8            (P) Assessment investments. Each Organizational 9        Unit shall receive $25 per student of the combined ASE 10        of pre-kindergarten children with disabilities and all 11        kindergarten through grade 12 students to cover 12        assessment costs.13            (Q) Computer technology and equipment investments. 14        Each Organizational Unit shall receive $285.50 per 15        student of the combined ASE of pre-kindergarten 16        children with disabilities and all kindergarten 17        through grade 12 students to cover computer technology 18        and equipment costs. For the 2018-2019 school year and 19        subsequent school years, Organizational Units assigned 20        to Tier 1 and Tier 2 in the prior school year shall 21        receive an additional $285.50 per student of the 22        combined ASE of pre-kindergarten children with 23        disabilities and all kindergarten through grade 12 24        students to cover computer technology and equipment 25        costs in the Organizational Unit's Adequacy Target. 26        The State Board may establish additional requirements   HB1925- 33 -LRB104 09564 LNS 19627 b1        for Organizational Unit expenditures of funds received 2        pursuant to this subparagraph (Q), including a 3        requirement that funds received pursuant to this 4        subparagraph (Q) may be used only for serving the 5        technology needs of the district. It is the intent of 6        Public Act 100-465 that all Tier 1 and Tier 2 districts 7        receive the addition to their Adequacy Target in the 8        following year, subject to compliance with the 9        requirements of the State Board.10            (R) Student activities investments. Each 11        Organizational Unit shall receive the following 12        funding amounts to cover student activities: $100 per 13        kindergarten through grade 5 ASE student in elementary 14        school, plus $200 per ASE student in middle school, 15        plus $675 per ASE student in high school.16            (S) Maintenance and operations investments. Each 17        Organizational Unit shall receive $1,038 per student 18        of the combined ASE of pre-kindergarten children with 19        disabilities and all kindergarten through grade 12 20        students for day-to-day maintenance and operations 21        expenditures, including salary, supplies, and 22        materials, as well as purchased services, but 23        excluding employee benefits. The proportion of salary 24        for the application of a Regionalization Factor and 25        the calculation of benefits is equal to $352.92.26            (T) Central office investments. Each   HB1925- 34 -LRB104 09564 LNS 19627 b1        Organizational Unit shall receive $742 per student of 2        the combined ASE of pre-kindergarten children with 3        disabilities and all kindergarten through grade 12 4        students to cover central office operations, including 5        administrators and classified personnel charged with 6        managing the instructional programs, business and 7        operations of the school district, and security 8        personnel. The proportion of salary for the 9        application of a Regionalization Factor and the 10        calculation of benefits is equal to $368.48.11            (U) Employee benefit investments. Each 12        Organizational Unit shall receive 30% of the total of 13        all salary-calculated elements of the Adequacy Target, 14        excluding substitute teachers and student activities 15        investments, to cover benefit costs. For central 16        office and maintenance and operations investments, the 17        benefit calculation shall be based upon the salary 18        proportion of each investment. If at any time the 19        responsibility for funding the employer normal cost of 20        teacher pensions is assigned to school districts, then 21        that amount certified by the Teachers' Retirement 22        System of the State of Illinois to be paid by the 23        Organizational Unit for the preceding school year 24        shall be added to the benefit investment. For any 25        fiscal year in which a school district organized under 26        Article 34 of this Code is responsible for paying the   HB1925- 35 -LRB104 09564 LNS 19627 b1        employer normal cost of teacher pensions, then that 2        amount of its employer normal cost plus the amount for 3        retiree health insurance as certified by the Public 4        School Teachers' Pension and Retirement Fund of 5        Chicago to be paid by the school district for the 6        preceding school year that is statutorily required to 7        cover employer normal costs and the amount for retiree 8        health insurance shall be added to the 30% specified 9        in this subparagraph (U). The Teachers' Retirement 10        System of the State of Illinois and the Public School 11        Teachers' Pension and Retirement Fund of Chicago shall 12        submit such information as the State Superintendent 13        may require for the calculations set forth in this 14        subparagraph (U). 15            (V) Additional investments in low-income students. 16        In addition to and not in lieu of all other funding 17        under this paragraph (2), each Organizational Unit 18        shall receive funding based on the average teacher 19        salary for grades K through 12 to cover the costs of:20                (i) one FTE intervention teacher (tutor) 21            position for every 125 Low-Income Count students;22                (ii) one FTE pupil support staff position for 23            every 125 Low-Income Count students;24                (iii) one FTE extended day teacher position 25            for every 120 Low-Income Count students; and26                (iv) one FTE summer school teacher position   HB1925- 36 -LRB104 09564 LNS 19627 b1            for every 120 Low-Income Count students.2            (W) Additional investments in English learner 3        students. In addition to and not in lieu of all other 4        funding under this paragraph (2), each Organizational 5        Unit shall receive funding based on the average 6        teacher salary for grades K through 12 to cover the 7        costs of: 8                (i) one FTE intervention teacher (tutor) 9            position for every 125 English learner students;10                (ii) one FTE pupil support staff position for 11            every 125 English learner students;12                (iii) one FTE extended day teacher position 13            for every 120 English learner students;14                (iv) one FTE summer school teacher position 15            for every 120 English learner students; and16                (v) one FTE core teacher position for every 17            100 English learner students. 18            (X) Special education investments. Each 19        Organizational Unit shall receive funding based on the 20        average teacher salary for grades K through 12 to 21        cover special education as follows: 22                (i) one FTE teacher position for every 141 23            combined ASE of pre-kindergarten children with 24            disabilities and all kindergarten through grade 12 25            students;26                (ii) one FTE instructional assistant for every   HB1925- 37 -LRB104 09564 LNS 19627 b1            141 combined ASE of pre-kindergarten children with 2            disabilities and all kindergarten through grade 12 3            students; and4                (iii) one FTE psychologist position for every 5            1,000 combined ASE of pre-kindergarten children 6            with disabilities and all kindergarten through 7            grade 12 students. 8        (3) For calculating the salaries included within the 9    Essential Elements, the State Superintendent shall 10    annually calculate average salaries to the nearest dollar 11    using the employment information system data maintained by 12    the State Board, limited to public schools only and 13    excluding special education and vocational cooperatives, 14    schools operated by the Department of Juvenile Justice, 15    and charter schools, for the following positions: 16            (A) Teacher for grades K through 8.17            (B) Teacher for grades 9 through 12.18            (C) Teacher for grades K through 12.19            (D) School counselor for grades K through 8.20            (E) School counselor for grades 9 through 12.21            (F) School counselor for grades K through 12.22            (G) Social worker.23            (H) Psychologist.24            (I) Librarian.25            (J) Nurse.26            (K) Principal.  HB1925- 38 -LRB104 09564 LNS 19627 b1            (L) Assistant principal. 2        For the purposes of this paragraph (3), "teacher" 3    includes core teachers, specialist and elective teachers, 4    instructional facilitators, tutors, special education 5    teachers, pupil support staff teachers, English learner 6    teachers, extended day teachers, and summer school 7    teachers. Where specific grade data is not required for 8    the Essential Elements, the average salary for 9    corresponding positions shall apply. For substitute 10    teachers, the average teacher salary for grades K through 11    12 shall apply. 12        For calculating the salaries included within the 13    Essential Elements for positions not included within EIS 14    Data, the following salaries shall be used in the first 15    year of implementation of Evidence-Based Funding: 16            (i) school site staff, $30,000; and17            (ii) non-instructional assistant, instructional 18        assistant, library aide, library media tech, or 19        supervisory aide: $25,000. 20        In the second and subsequent years of implementation 21    of Evidence-Based Funding, the amounts in items (i) and 22    (ii) of this paragraph (3) shall annually increase by the 23    ECI. 24        The salary amounts for the Essential Elements 25    determined pursuant to subparagraphs (A) through (L), (S) 26    and (T), and (V) through (X) of paragraph (2) of   HB1925- 39 -LRB104 09564 LNS 19627 b1    subsection (b) of this Section shall be multiplied by a 2    Regionalization Factor. 3    (c) Local Capacity calculation. 4        (1) Each Organizational Unit's Local Capacity 5    represents an amount of funding it is assumed to 6    contribute toward its Adequacy Target for purposes of the 7    Evidence-Based Funding formula calculation. "Local 8    Capacity" means either (i) the Organizational Unit's Local 9    Capacity Target as calculated in accordance with paragraph 10    (2) of this subsection (c) if its Real Receipts are equal 11    to or less than its Local Capacity Target or (ii) the 12    Organizational Unit's Adjusted Local Capacity, as 13    calculated in accordance with paragraph (3) of this 14    subsection (c) if Real Receipts are more than its Local 15    Capacity Target.16        (2) "Local Capacity Target" means, for an 17    Organizational Unit, that dollar amount that is obtained 18    by multiplying its Adequacy Target by its Local Capacity 19    Ratio. 20            (A) An Organizational Unit's Local Capacity 21        Percentage is the conversion of the Organizational 22        Unit's Local Capacity Ratio, as such ratio is 23        determined in accordance with subparagraph (B) of this 24        paragraph (2), into a cumulative distribution 25        resulting in a percentile ranking to determine each 26        Organizational Unit's relative position to all other   HB1925- 40 -LRB104 09564 LNS 19627 b1        Organizational Units in this State. The calculation of 2        Local Capacity Percentage is described in subparagraph 3        (C) of this paragraph (2).4            (B) An Organizational Unit's Local Capacity Ratio 5        in a given year is the percentage obtained by dividing 6        its Adjusted EAV or PTELL EAV, whichever is less, by 7        its Adequacy Target, with the resulting ratio further 8        adjusted as follows: 9                (i) for Organizational Units serving grades 10            kindergarten through 12 and Hybrid Districts, no 11            further adjustments shall be made;12                (ii) for Organizational Units serving grades 13            kindergarten through 8, the ratio shall be 14            multiplied by 9/13;15                (iii) for Organizational Units serving grades 16            9 through 12, the Local Capacity Ratio shall be 17            multiplied by 4/13; and18                (iv) for an Organizational Unit with a 19            different grade configuration than those specified 20            in items (i) through (iii) of this subparagraph 21            (B), the State Superintendent shall determine a 22            comparable adjustment based on the grades served. 23            (C) The Local Capacity Percentage is equal to the 24        percentile ranking of the district. Local Capacity 25        Percentage converts each Organizational Unit's Local 26        Capacity Ratio to a cumulative distribution resulting   HB1925- 41 -LRB104 09564 LNS 19627 b1        in a percentile ranking to determine each 2        Organizational Unit's relative position to all other 3        Organizational Units in this State. The Local Capacity 4        Percentage cumulative distribution resulting in a 5        percentile ranking for each Organizational Unit shall 6        be calculated using the standard normal distribution 7        of the score in relation to the weighted mean and 8        weighted standard deviation and Local Capacity Ratios 9        of all Organizational Units. If the value assigned to 10        any Organizational Unit is in excess of 90%, the value 11        shall be adjusted to 90%. For Laboratory Schools, the 12        Local Capacity Percentage shall be set at 10% in 13        recognition of the absence of EAV and resources from 14        the public university that are allocated to the 15        Laboratory School. For a regional office of education 16        or an intermediate service center operating one or 17        more alternative education programs, the Local 18        Capacity Percentage must be set at 10% in recognition 19        of the absence of EAV and resources from school 20        districts that are allocated to the regional office of 21        education or intermediate service center. The weighted 22        mean for the Local Capacity Percentage shall be 23        determined by multiplying each Organizational Unit's 24        Local Capacity Ratio times the ASE for the unit 25        creating a weighted value, summing the weighted values 26        of all Organizational Units, and dividing by the total   HB1925- 42 -LRB104 09564 LNS 19627 b1        ASE of all Organizational Units. The weighted standard 2        deviation shall be determined by taking the square 3        root of the weighted variance of all Organizational 4        Units' Local Capacity Ratio, where the variance is 5        calculated by squaring the difference between each 6        unit's Local Capacity Ratio and the weighted mean, 7        then multiplying the variance for each unit times the 8        ASE for the unit to create a weighted variance for each 9        unit, then summing all units' weighted variance and 10        dividing by the total ASE of all units.11            (D) For any Organizational Unit, the 12        Organizational Unit's Adjusted Local Capacity Target 13        shall be reduced by either (i) the school board's 14        remaining contribution pursuant to paragraph (ii) of 15        subsection (b-4) of Section 16-158 of the Illinois 16        Pension Code in a given year or (ii) the board of 17        education's remaining contribution pursuant to 18        paragraph (iv) of subsection (b) of Section 17-129 of 19        the Illinois Pension Code absent the employer normal 20        cost portion of the required contribution and amount 21        allowed pursuant to subdivision (3) of Section 22        17-142.1 of the Illinois Pension Code in a given year. 23        In the preceding sentence, item (i) shall be certified 24        to the State Board of Education by the Teachers' 25        Retirement System of the State of Illinois and item 26        (ii) shall be certified to the State Board of   HB1925- 43 -LRB104 09564 LNS 19627 b1        Education by the Public School Teachers' Pension and 2        Retirement Fund of the City of Chicago. 3        (3) If an Organizational Unit's Real Receipts are more 4    than its Local Capacity Target, then its Local Capacity 5    shall equal an Adjusted Local Capacity Target as 6    calculated in accordance with this paragraph (3). The 7    Adjusted Local Capacity Target is calculated as the sum of 8    the Organizational Unit's Local Capacity Target and its 9    Real Receipts Adjustment. The Real Receipts Adjustment 10    equals the Organizational Unit's Real Receipts less its 11    Local Capacity Target, with the resulting figure 12    multiplied by the Local Capacity Percentage.13        As used in this paragraph (3), "Real Percent of 14    Adequacy" means the sum of an Organizational Unit's Real 15    Receipts, CPPRT, and Base Funding Minimum, with the 16    resulting figure divided by the Organizational Unit's 17    Adequacy Target. 18    (d) Calculation of Real Receipts, EAV, and Adjusted EAV 19for purposes of the Local Capacity calculation. 20        (1) An Organizational Unit's Real Receipts are the 21    product of its Applicable Tax Rate and its Adjusted EAV. 22    An Organizational Unit's Applicable Tax Rate is its 23    Adjusted Operating Tax Rate for property within the 24    Organizational Unit.25        (2) The State Superintendent shall calculate the 26    equalized assessed valuation, or EAV, of all taxable   HB1925- 44 -LRB104 09564 LNS 19627 b1    property of each Organizational Unit as of September 30 of 2    the previous year in accordance with paragraph (3) of this 3    subsection (d). The State Superintendent shall then 4    determine the Adjusted EAV of each Organizational Unit in 5    accordance with paragraph (4) of this subsection (d), 6    which Adjusted EAV figure shall be used for the purposes 7    of calculating Local Capacity.8        (3) To calculate Real Receipts and EAV, the Department 9    of Revenue shall supply to the State Superintendent the 10    value as equalized or assessed by the Department of 11    Revenue of all taxable property of every Organizational 12    Unit, together with (i) the applicable tax rate used in 13    extending taxes for the funds of the Organizational Unit 14    as of September 30 of the previous year and (ii) the 15    limiting rate for all Organizational Units subject to 16    property tax extension limitations as imposed under PTELL. 17            (A) The Department of Revenue shall add to the 18        equalized assessed value of all taxable property of 19        each Organizational Unit situated entirely or 20        partially within a county that is or was subject to the 21        provisions of Section 15-176 or 15-177 of the Property 22        Tax Code (i) an amount equal to the total amount by 23        which the homestead exemption allowed under Section 24        15-176 or 15-177 of the Property Tax Code for real 25        property situated in that Organizational Unit exceeds 26        the total amount that would have been allowed in that   HB1925- 45 -LRB104 09564 LNS 19627 b1        Organizational Unit if the maximum reduction under 2        Section 15-176 was (I) $4,500 in Cook County or $3,500 3        in all other counties in tax year 2003 or (II) $5,000 4        in all counties in tax year 2004 and thereafter and 5        (ii) an amount equal to the aggregate amount for the 6        taxable year of all additional exemptions under 7        Section 15-175 of the Property Tax Code for owners 8        with a household income of $30,000 or less. The county 9        clerk of any county that is or was subject to the 10        provisions of Section 15-176 or 15-177 of the Property 11        Tax Code shall annually calculate and certify to the 12        Department of Revenue for each Organizational Unit all 13        homestead exemption amounts under Section 15-176 or 14        15-177 of the Property Tax Code and all amounts of 15        additional exemptions under Section 15-175 of the 16        Property Tax Code for owners with a household income 17        of $30,000 or less. It is the intent of this 18        subparagraph (A) that if the general homestead 19        exemption for a parcel of property is determined under 20        Section 15-176 or 15-177 of the Property Tax Code 21        rather than Section 15-175, then the calculation of 22        EAV shall not be affected by the difference, if any, 23        between the amount of the general homestead exemption 24        allowed for that parcel of property under Section 25        15-176 or 15-177 of the Property Tax Code and the 26        amount that would have been allowed had the general   HB1925- 46 -LRB104 09564 LNS 19627 b1        homestead exemption for that parcel of property been 2        determined under Section 15-175 of the Property Tax 3        Code. It is further the intent of this subparagraph 4        (A) that if additional exemptions are allowed under 5        Section 15-175 of the Property Tax Code for owners 6        with a household income of less than $30,000, then the 7        calculation of EAV shall not be affected by the 8        difference, if any, because of those additional 9        exemptions.10            (B) With respect to any part of an Organizational 11        Unit within a redevelopment project area in respect to 12        which a municipality has adopted tax increment 13        allocation financing pursuant to the Tax Increment 14        Allocation Redevelopment Act, Division 74.4 of Article 15        11 of the Illinois Municipal Code, or the Industrial 16        Jobs Recovery Law, Division 74.6 of Article 11 of the 17        Illinois Municipal Code, no part of the current EAV of 18        real property located in any such project area that is 19        attributable to an increase above the total initial 20        EAV of such property shall be used as part of the EAV 21        of the Organizational Unit, until such time as all 22        redevelopment project costs have been paid, as 23        provided in Section 11-74.4-8 of the Tax Increment 24        Allocation Redevelopment Act or in Section 11-74.6-35 25        of the Industrial Jobs Recovery Law. For the purpose 26        of the EAV of the Organizational Unit, the total   HB1925- 47 -LRB104 09564 LNS 19627 b1        initial EAV or the current EAV, whichever is lower, 2        shall be used until such time as all redevelopment 3        project costs have been paid.4            (B-5) The real property equalized assessed 5        valuation for a school district shall be adjusted by 6        subtracting from the real property value, as equalized 7        or assessed by the Department of Revenue, for the 8        district an amount computed by dividing the amount of 9        any abatement of taxes under Section 18-170 of the 10        Property Tax Code by 3.00% for a district maintaining 11        grades kindergarten through 12, by 2.30% for a 12        district maintaining grades kindergarten through 8, or 13        by 1.05% for a district maintaining grades 9 through 14        12 and adjusted by an amount computed by dividing the 15        amount of any abatement of taxes under subsection (a) 16        of Section 18-165 of the Property Tax Code by the same 17        percentage rates for district type as specified in 18        this subparagraph (B-5). 19            (C) For Organizational Units that are Hybrid 20        Districts, the State Superintendent shall use the 21        lesser of the adjusted equalized assessed valuation 22        for property within the partial elementary unit 23        district for elementary purposes, as defined in 24        Article 11E of this Code, or the adjusted equalized 25        assessed valuation for property within the partial 26        elementary unit district for high school purposes, as   HB1925- 48 -LRB104 09564 LNS 19627 b1        defined in Article 11E of this Code. 2            (D) If a school district's boundaries span 3        multiple counties, then the Department of Revenue 4        shall send to the State Board, for the purposes of 5        calculating Evidence-Based Funding, the limiting rate 6        and individual rates by purpose for the county that 7        contains the majority of the school district's 8        equalized assessed valuation. 9        (4) An Organizational Unit's Adjusted EAV shall be the 10    average of its EAV over the immediately preceding 3 years 11    or the lesser of its EAV in the immediately preceding year 12    or the average of its EAV over the immediately preceding 3 13    years if the EAV in the immediately preceding year has 14    declined by 10% or more when comparing the 2 most recent 15    years. In the event of Organizational Unit reorganization, 16    consolidation, or annexation, the Organizational Unit's 17    Adjusted EAV for the first 3 years after such change shall 18    be as follows: the most current EAV shall be used in the 19    first year, the average of a 2-year EAV or its EAV in the 20    immediately preceding year if the EAV declines by 10% or 21    more when comparing the 2 most recent years for the second 22    year, and the lesser of a 3-year average EAV or its EAV in 23    the immediately preceding year if the Adjusted EAV 24    declines by 10% or more when comparing the 2 most recent 25    years for the third year. For any school district whose 26    EAV in the immediately preceding year is used in   HB1925- 49 -LRB104 09564 LNS 19627 b1    calculations, in the following year, the Adjusted EAV 2    shall be the average of its EAV over the immediately 3    preceding 2 years or the immediately preceding year if 4    that year represents a decline of 10% or more when 5    comparing the 2 most recent years. 6        "PTELL EAV" means a figure calculated by the State 7    Board for Organizational Units subject to PTELL as 8    described in this paragraph (4) for the purposes of 9    calculating an Organizational Unit's Local Capacity Ratio. 10    Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph (4), the 11    PTELL EAV of an Organizational Unit shall be equal to the 12    product of the equalized assessed valuation last used in 13    the calculation of general State aid under Section 18-8.05 14    of this Code (now repealed) or Evidence-Based Funding 15    under this Section and the Organizational Unit's Extension 16    Limitation Ratio. If an Organizational Unit has approved 17    or does approve an increase in its limiting rate, pursuant 18    to Section 18-190 of the Property Tax Code, affecting the 19    Base Tax Year, the PTELL EAV shall be equal to the product 20    of the equalized assessed valuation last used in the 21    calculation of general State aid under Section 18-8.05 of 22    this Code (now repealed) or Evidence-Based Funding under 23    this Section multiplied by an amount equal to one plus the 24    percentage increase, if any, in the Consumer Price Index 25    for All Urban Consumers for all items published by the 26    United States Department of Labor for the 12-month   HB1925- 50 -LRB104 09564 LNS 19627 b1    calendar year preceding the Base Tax Year, plus the 2    equalized assessed valuation of new property, annexed 3    property, and recovered tax increment value and minus the 4    equalized assessed valuation of disconnected property.5        As used in this paragraph (4), "new property" and 6    "recovered tax increment value" shall have the meanings 7    set forth in the Property Tax Extension Limitation Law.8    (e) Base Funding Minimum calculation. 9        (1) For the 2017-2018 school year, the Base Funding 10    Minimum of an Organizational Unit or a Specially Funded 11    Unit shall be the amount of State funds distributed to the 12    Organizational Unit or Specially Funded Unit during the 13    2016-2017 school year prior to any adjustments and 14    specified appropriation amounts described in this 15    paragraph (1) from the following Sections, as calculated 16    by the State Superintendent: Section 18-8.05 of this Code 17    (now repealed); Section 5 of Article 224 of Public Act 18    99-524 (equity grants); Section 14-7.02b of this Code 19    (funding for children requiring special education 20    services); Section 14-13.01 of this Code (special 21    education facilities and staffing), except for 22    reimbursement of the cost of transportation pursuant to 23    Section 14-13.01; Section 14C-12 of this Code (English 24    learners); and Section 18-4.3 of this Code (summer 25    school), based on an appropriation level of $13,121,600. 26    For a school district organized under Article 34 of this   HB1925- 51 -LRB104 09564 LNS 19627 b1    Code, the Base Funding Minimum also includes (i) the funds 2    allocated to the school district pursuant to Section 1D-1 3    of this Code attributable to funding programs authorized 4    by the Sections of this Code listed in the preceding 5    sentence and (ii) the difference between (I) the funds 6    allocated to the school district pursuant to Section 1D-1 7    of this Code attributable to the funding programs 8    authorized by Section 14-7.02 (non-public special 9    education reimbursement), subsection (b) of Section 10    14-13.01 (special education transportation), Section 29-5 11    (transportation), Section 2-3.80 (agricultural 12    education), Section 2-3.66 (truants' alternative 13    education), Section 2-3.62 (educational service centers), 14    and Section 14-7.03 (special education - orphanage) of 15    this Code and Section 15 of the Childhood Hunger Relief 16    Act (free breakfast program) and (II) the school 17    district's actual expenditures for its non-public special 18    education, special education transportation, 19    transportation programs, agricultural education, truants' 20    alternative education, services that would otherwise be 21    performed by a regional office of education, special 22    education orphanage expenditures, and free breakfast, as 23    most recently calculated and reported pursuant to 24    subsection (f) of Section 1D-1 of this Code. The Base 25    Funding Minimum for Glenwood Academy shall be $952,014. 26    For programs operated by a regional office of education or   HB1925- 52 -LRB104 09564 LNS 19627 b1    an intermediate service center, the Base Funding Minimum 2    must be the total amount of State funds allocated to those 3    programs in the 2018-2019 school year and amounts provided 4    pursuant to Article 34 of Public Act 100-586 and Section 5    3-16 of this Code. All programs established after June 5, 6    2019 (the effective date of Public Act 101-10) and 7    administered by a regional office of education or an 8    intermediate service center must have an initial Base 9    Funding Minimum set to an amount equal to the first-year 10    ASE multiplied by the amount of per pupil funding received 11    in the previous school year by the lowest funded similar 12    existing program type. If the enrollment for a program 13    operated by a regional office of education or an 14    intermediate service center is zero, then it may not 15    receive Base Funding Minimum funds for that program in the 16    next fiscal year, and those funds must be distributed to 17    Organizational Units under subsection (g).18        (2) For the 2018-2019 and subsequent school years, the 19    Base Funding Minimum of Organizational Units and Specially 20    Funded Units shall be the sum of (i) the amount of 21    Evidence-Based Funding for the prior school year, (ii) the 22    Base Funding Minimum for the prior school year, and (iii) 23    any amount received by a school district pursuant to 24    Section 7 of Article 97 of Public Act 100-21. 25        For the 2022-2023 school year, the Base Funding 26    Minimum of Organizational Units shall be the amounts   HB1925- 53 -LRB104 09564 LNS 19627 b1    recalculated by the State Board of Education for Fiscal 2    Year 2019 through Fiscal Year 2022 that were necessary due 3    to average student enrollment errors for districts 4    organized under Article 34 of this Code, plus the Fiscal 5    Year 2022 property tax relief grants provided under 6    Section 2-3.170 of this Code, ensuring each Organizational 7    Unit has the correct amount of resources for Fiscal Year 8    2023 Evidence-Based Funding calculations and that Fiscal 9    Year 2023 Evidence-Based Funding Distributions are made in 10    accordance with this Section. 11        (3) Subject to approval by the General Assembly as 12    provided in this paragraph (3), an Organizational Unit 13    that meets all of the following criteria, as determined by 14    the State Board, shall have District Intervention Money 15    added to its Base Funding Minimum at the time the Base 16    Funding Minimum is calculated by the State Board: 17            (A) The Organizational Unit is operating under an 18        Independent Authority under Section 2-3.25f-5 of this 19        Code for a minimum of 4 school years or is subject to 20        the control of the State Board pursuant to a court 21        order for a minimum of 4 school years.22            (B) The Organizational Unit was designated as a 23        Tier 1 or Tier 2 Organizational Unit in the previous 24        school year under paragraph (3) of subsection (g) of 25        this Section.26            (C) The Organizational Unit demonstrates   HB1925- 54 -LRB104 09564 LNS 19627 b1        sustainability through a 5-year financial and 2        strategic plan.3            (D) The Organizational Unit has made sufficient 4        progress and achieved sufficient stability in the 5        areas of governance, academic growth, and finances. 6        As part of its determination under this paragraph (3), 7    the State Board may consider the Organizational Unit's 8    summative designation, any accreditations of the 9    Organizational Unit, or the Organizational Unit's 10    financial profile, as calculated by the State Board.11        If the State Board determines that an Organizational 12    Unit has met the criteria set forth in this paragraph (3), 13    it must submit a report to the General Assembly, no later 14    than January 2 of the fiscal year in which the State Board 15    makes it determination, on the amount of District 16    Intervention Money to add to the Organizational Unit's 17    Base Funding Minimum. The General Assembly must review the 18    State Board's report and may approve or disapprove, by 19    joint resolution, the addition of District Intervention 20    Money. If the General Assembly fails to act on the report 21    within 40 calendar days from the receipt of the report, 22    the addition of District Intervention Money is deemed 23    approved. If the General Assembly approves the amount of 24    District Intervention Money to be added to the 25    Organizational Unit's Base Funding Minimum, the District 26    Intervention Money must be added to the Base Funding   HB1925- 55 -LRB104 09564 LNS 19627 b1    Minimum annually thereafter.2        For the first 4 years following the initial year that 3    the State Board determines that an Organizational Unit has 4    met the criteria set forth in this paragraph (3) and has 5    received funding under this Section, the Organizational 6    Unit must annually submit to the State Board, on or before 7    November 30, a progress report regarding its financial and 8    strategic plan under subparagraph (C) of this paragraph 9    (3). The plan shall include the financial data from the 10    past 4 annual financial reports or financial audits that 11    must be presented to the State Board by November 15 of each 12    year and the approved budget financial data for the 13    current year. The plan shall be developed according to the 14    guidelines presented to the Organizational Unit by the 15    State Board. The plan shall further include financial 16    projections for the next 3 fiscal years and include a 17    discussion and financial summary of the Organizational 18    Unit's facility needs. If the Organizational Unit does not 19    demonstrate sufficient progress toward its 5-year plan or 20    if it has failed to file an annual financial report, an 21    annual budget, a financial plan, a deficit reduction plan, 22    or other financial information as required by law, the 23    State Board may establish a Financial Oversight Panel 24    under Article 1H of this Code. However, if the 25    Organizational Unit already has a Financial Oversight 26    Panel, the State Board may extend the duration of the   HB1925- 56 -LRB104 09564 LNS 19627 b1    Panel. 2    (f) Percent of Adequacy and Final Resources calculation. 3        (1) The Evidence-Based Funding formula establishes a 4    Percent of Adequacy for each Organizational Unit in order 5    to place such units into tiers for the purposes of the 6    funding distribution system described in subsection (g) of 7    this Section. Initially, an Organizational Unit's 8    Preliminary Resources and Preliminary Percent of Adequacy 9    are calculated pursuant to paragraph (2) of this 10    subsection (f). Then, an Organizational Unit's Final 11    Resources and Final Percent of Adequacy are calculated to 12    account for the Organizational Unit's poverty 13    concentration levels pursuant to paragraphs (3) and (4) of 14    this subsection (f).15        (2) An Organizational Unit's Preliminary Resources are 16    equal to the sum of its Local Capacity Target, CPPRT, and 17    Base Funding Minimum. An Organizational Unit's Preliminary 18    Percent of Adequacy is the lesser of (i) its Preliminary 19    Resources divided by its Adequacy Target or (ii) 100%.20        (3) Except for Specially Funded Units, an 21    Organizational Unit's Final Resources are equal to the sum 22    of its Local Capacity, CPPRT, and Adjusted Base Funding 23    Minimum. The Base Funding Minimum of each Specially Funded 24    Unit shall serve as its Final Resources, except that the 25    Base Funding Minimum for State-approved charter schools 26    shall not include any portion of general State aid   HB1925- 57 -LRB104 09564 LNS 19627 b1    allocated in the prior year based on the per capita 2    tuition charge times the charter school enrollment.3        (4) An Organizational Unit's Final Percent of Adequacy 4    is its Final Resources divided by its Adequacy Target. An 5    Organizational Unit's Adjusted Base Funding Minimum is 6    equal to its Base Funding Minimum less its Supplemental 7    Grant Funding, with the resulting figure added to the 8    product of its Supplemental Grant Funding and Preliminary 9    Percent of Adequacy. 10    (g) Evidence-Based Funding formula distribution system. 11        (1) In each school year under the Evidence-Based 12    Funding formula, each Organizational Unit receives funding 13    equal to the sum of its Base Funding Minimum and the unit's 14    allocation of New State Funds determined pursuant to this 15    subsection (g). To allocate New State Funds, the 16    Evidence-Based Funding formula distribution system first 17    places all Organizational Units into one of 4 tiers in 18    accordance with paragraph (3) of this subsection (g), 19    based on the Organizational Unit's Final Percent of 20    Adequacy. New State Funds are allocated to each of the 4 21    tiers as follows: Tier 1 Aggregate Funding equals 50% of 22    all New State Funds, Tier 2 Aggregate Funding equals 49% 23    of all New State Funds, Tier 3 Aggregate Funding equals 24    0.9% of all New State Funds, and Tier 4 Aggregate Funding 25    equals 0.1% of all New State Funds. Each Organizational 26    Unit within Tier 1 or Tier 2 receives an allocation of New   HB1925- 58 -LRB104 09564 LNS 19627 b1    State Funds equal to its tier Funding Gap, as defined in 2    the following sentence, multiplied by the tier's 3    Allocation Rate determined pursuant to paragraph (4) of 4    this subsection (g). For Tier 1, an Organizational Unit's 5    Funding Gap equals the tier's Target Ratio, as specified 6    in paragraph (5) of this subsection (g), multiplied by the 7    Organizational Unit's Adequacy Target, with the resulting 8    amount reduced by the Organizational Unit's Final 9    Resources. For Tier 2, an Organizational Unit's Funding 10    Gap equals the tier's Target Ratio, as described in 11    paragraph (5) of this subsection (g), multiplied by the 12    Organizational Unit's Adequacy Target, with the resulting 13    amount reduced by the Organizational Unit's Final 14    Resources and its Tier 1 funding allocation. To determine 15    the Organizational Unit's Funding Gap, the resulting 16    amount is then multiplied by a factor equal to one minus 17    the Organizational Unit's Local Capacity Target 18    percentage. Each Organizational Unit within Tier 3 or Tier 19    4 receives an allocation of New State Funds equal to the 20    product of its Adequacy Target and the tier's Allocation 21    Rate, as specified in paragraph (4) of this subsection 22    (g).23        (2) To ensure equitable distribution of dollars for 24    all Tier 2 Organizational Units, no Tier 2 Organizational 25    Unit shall receive fewer dollars per ASE than any Tier 3 26    Organizational Unit. Each Tier 2 and Tier 3 Organizational   HB1925- 59 -LRB104 09564 LNS 19627 b1    Unit shall have its funding allocation divided by its ASE. 2    Any Tier 2 Organizational Unit with a funding allocation 3    per ASE below the greatest Tier 3 allocation per ASE shall 4    get a funding allocation equal to the greatest Tier 3 5    funding allocation per ASE multiplied by the 6    Organizational Unit's ASE. Each Tier 2 Organizational 7    Unit's Tier 2 funding allocation shall be multiplied by 8    the percentage calculated by dividing the original Tier 2 9    Aggregate Funding by the sum of all Tier 2 Organizational 10    Units' Tier 2 funding allocation after adjusting 11    districts' funding below Tier 3 levels. 12        (3) Organizational Units are placed into one of 4 13    tiers as follows: 14            (A) Tier 1 consists of all Organizational Units, 15        except for Specially Funded Units, with a Percent of 16        Adequacy less than the Tier 1 Target Ratio. The Tier 1 17        Target Ratio is the ratio level that allows for Tier 1 18        Aggregate Funding to be distributed, with the Tier 1 19        Allocation Rate determined pursuant to paragraph (4) 20        of this subsection (g).21            (B) Tier 2 consists of all Tier 1 Units and all 22        other Organizational Units, except for Specially 23        Funded Units, with a Percent of Adequacy of less than 24        0.90.25            (C) Tier 3 consists of all Organizational Units, 26        except for Specially Funded Units, with a Percent of   HB1925- 60 -LRB104 09564 LNS 19627 b1        Adequacy of at least 0.90 and less than 1.0.2            (D) Tier 4 consists of all Organizational Units 3        with a Percent of Adequacy of at least 1.0. 4        (4) The Allocation Rates for Tiers 1 through 4 are 5    determined as follows: 6            (A) The Tier 1 Allocation Rate is 30%.7            (B) The Tier 2 Allocation Rate is the result of the 8        following equation: Tier 2 Aggregate Funding, divided 9        by the sum of the Funding Gaps for all Tier 2 10        Organizational Units, unless the result of such 11        equation is higher than 1.0. If the result of such 12        equation is higher than 1.0, then the Tier 2 13        Allocation Rate is 1.0. 14            (C) The Tier 3 Allocation Rate is the result of the 15        following equation: Tier 3 Aggregate Funding, divided 16        by the sum of the Adequacy Targets of all Tier 3 17        Organizational Units.18            (D) The Tier 4 Allocation Rate is the result of the 19        following equation: Tier 4 Aggregate Funding, divided 20        by the sum of the Adequacy Targets of all Tier 4 21        Organizational Units. 22        (5) A tier's Target Ratio is determined as follows: 23            (A) The Tier 1 Target Ratio is the ratio level that 24        allows for Tier 1 Aggregate Funding to be distributed 25        with the Tier 1 Allocation Rate.26            (B) The Tier 2 Target Ratio is 0.90.  HB1925- 61 -LRB104 09564 LNS 19627 b1            (C) The Tier 3 Target Ratio is 1.0.2        (6) If, at any point, the Tier 1 Target Ratio is 3    greater than 90%, then all Tier 1 funding shall be 4    allocated to Tier 2 and no Tier 1 Organizational Unit's 5    funding may be identified.6        (7) In the event that all Tier 2 Organizational Units 7    receive funding at the Tier 2 Target Ratio level, any 8    remaining New State Funds shall be allocated to Tier 3 and 9    Tier 4 Organizational Units. 10        (8) If any Specially Funded Units, excluding Glenwood 11    Academy, recognized by the State Board do not qualify for 12    direct funding following the implementation of Public Act 13    100-465 from any of the funding sources included within 14    the definition of Base Funding Minimum, the unqualified 15    portion of the Base Funding Minimum shall be transferred 16    to one or more appropriate Organizational Units as 17    determined by the State Superintendent based on the prior 18    year ASE of the Organizational Units.19        (8.5) If a school district withdraws from a special 20    education cooperative, the portion of the Base Funding 21    Minimum that is attributable to the school district may be 22    redistributed to the school district upon withdrawal. The 23    school district and the cooperative must include the 24    amount of the Base Funding Minimum that is to be 25    reapportioned in their withdrawal agreement and notify the 26    State Board of the change with a copy of the agreement upon   HB1925- 62 -LRB104 09564 LNS 19627 b1    withdrawal. 2        (9) The Minimum Funding Level is intended to establish 3    a target for State funding that will keep pace with 4    inflation and continue to advance equity through the 5    Evidence-Based Funding formula. The target for State 6    funding of New Property Tax Relief Pool Funds is 7    $50,000,000 for State fiscal year 2019 and subsequent 8    State fiscal years. The Minimum Funding Level is equal to 9    $350,000,000. In addition to any New State Funds, no more 10    than $50,000,000 New Property Tax Relief Pool Funds may be 11    counted toward the Minimum Funding Level. If the sum of 12    New State Funds and applicable New Property Tax Relief 13    Pool Funds are less than the Minimum Funding Level, than 14    funding for tiers shall be reduced in the following 15    manner:16            (A) First, Tier 4 funding shall be reduced by an 17        amount equal to the difference between the Minimum 18        Funding Level and New State Funds until such time as 19        Tier 4 funding is exhausted.20            (B) Next, Tier 3 funding shall be reduced by an 21        amount equal to the difference between the Minimum 22        Funding Level and New State Funds and the reduction in 23        Tier 4 funding until such time as Tier 3 funding is 24        exhausted.25            (C) Next, Tier 2 funding shall be reduced by an 26        amount equal to the difference between the Minimum   HB1925- 63 -LRB104 09564 LNS 19627 b1        Funding Level and New State Funds and the reduction in 2        Tier 4 and Tier 3.3            (D) Finally, Tier 1 funding shall be reduced by an 4        amount equal to the difference between the Minimum 5        Funding level and New State Funds and the reduction in 6        Tier 2, 3, and 4 funding. In addition, the Allocation 7        Rate for Tier 1 shall be reduced to a percentage equal 8        to the Tier 1 Allocation Rate set by paragraph (4) of 9        this subsection (g), multiplied by the result of New 10        State Funds divided by the Minimum Funding Level.11        (9.5) For State fiscal year 2019 and subsequent State 12    fiscal years, if New State Funds exceed $300,000,000, then 13    any amount in excess of $300,000,000 shall be dedicated 14    for purposes of Section 2-3.170 of this Code up to a 15    maximum of $50,000,000. 16        (10) In the event of a decrease in the amount of the 17    appropriation for this Section in any fiscal year after 18    implementation of this Section, the Organizational Units 19    receiving Tier 1 and Tier 2 funding, as determined under 20    paragraph (3) of this subsection (g), shall be held 21    harmless by establishing a Base Funding Guarantee equal to 22    the per pupil kindergarten through grade 12 funding 23    received in accordance with this Section in the prior 24    fiscal year. Reductions shall be made to the Base Funding 25    Minimum of Organizational Units in Tier 3 and Tier 4 on a 26    per pupil basis equivalent to the total number of the ASE   HB1925- 64 -LRB104 09564 LNS 19627 b1    in Tier 3-funded and Tier 4-funded Organizational Units 2    divided by the total reduction in State funding. The Base 3    Funding Minimum as reduced shall continue to be applied to 4    Tier 3 and Tier 4 Organizational Units and adjusted by the 5    relative formula when increases in appropriations for this 6    Section resume. In no event may State funding reductions 7    to Organizational Units in Tier 3 or Tier 4 exceed an 8    amount that would be less than the Base Funding Minimum 9    established in the first year of implementation of this 10    Section. If additional reductions are required, all school 11    districts shall receive a reduction by a per pupil amount 12    equal to the aggregate additional appropriation reduction 13    divided by the total ASE of all Organizational Units. 14        (11) The State Superintendent shall make minor 15    adjustments to the distribution formula set forth in this 16    subsection (g) to account for the rounding of percentages 17    to the nearest tenth of a percentage and dollar amounts to 18    the nearest whole dollar. 19    (h) State Superintendent administration of funding and 20district submission requirements. 21        (1) The State Superintendent shall, in accordance with 22    appropriations made by the General Assembly or the 23    Education Prioritization Act, meet the funding obligations 24    created under this Section.25        (2) The State Superintendent shall calculate the 26    Adequacy Target for each Organizational Unit under this   HB1925- 65 -LRB104 09564 LNS 19627 b1    Section. No Evidence-Based Funding shall be distributed 2    within an Organizational Unit without the approval of the 3    unit's school board.4        (3) Annually, the State Superintendent shall calculate 5    and report to each Organizational Unit the unit's 6    aggregate financial adequacy amount, which shall be the 7    sum of the Adequacy Target for each Organizational Unit. 8    The State Superintendent shall calculate and report 9    separately for each Organizational Unit the unit's total 10    State funds allocated for its students with disabilities. 11    The State Superintendent shall calculate and report 12    separately for each Organizational Unit the amount of 13    funding and applicable FTE calculated for each Essential 14    Element of the unit's Adequacy Target.15        (4) Annually, the State Superintendent shall calculate 16    and report to each Organizational Unit the amount the unit 17    must expend on special education and bilingual education 18    and computer technology and equipment for Organizational 19    Units assigned to Tier 1 or Tier 2 that received an 20    additional $285.50 per student computer technology and 21    equipment investment grant to their Adequacy Target 22    pursuant to the unit's Base Funding Minimum, Special 23    Education Allocation, Bilingual Education Allocation, and 24    computer technology and equipment investment allocation.25        (5) Moneys distributed under this Section shall be 26    calculated on a school year basis, but paid on a fiscal   HB1925- 66 -LRB104 09564 LNS 19627 b1    year basis, with payments beginning in August and 2    extending through June. Unless otherwise provided, the 3    moneys appropriated for each fiscal year shall be 4    distributed in 22 equal payments at least 2 times monthly 5    to each Organizational Unit. If moneys appropriated for 6    any fiscal year are distributed other than monthly, the 7    distribution shall be on the same basis for each 8    Organizational Unit.9        (6) Any school district that fails, for any given 10    school year, to maintain school as required by law or to 11    maintain a recognized school is not eligible to receive 12    Evidence-Based Funding. In case of non-recognition of one 13    or more attendance centers in a school district otherwise 14    operating recognized schools, the claim of the district 15    shall be reduced in the proportion that the enrollment in 16    the attendance center or centers bears to the enrollment 17    of the school district. "Recognized school" means any 18    public school that meets the standards for recognition by 19    the State Board. A school district or attendance center 20    not having recognition status at the end of a school term 21    is entitled to receive State aid payments due upon a legal 22    claim that was filed while it was recognized.23        (7) School district claims filed under this Section 24    are subject to Sections 18-9 and 18-12 of this Code, 25    except as otherwise provided in this Section.26        (8) Each fiscal year, the State Superintendent shall   HB1925- 67 -LRB104 09564 LNS 19627 b1    calculate for each Organizational Unit an amount of its 2    Base Funding Minimum and Evidence-Based Funding that shall 3    be deemed attributable to the provision of special 4    educational facilities and services, as defined in Section 5    14-1.08 of this Code, in a manner that ensures compliance 6    with maintenance of State financial support requirements 7    under the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education 8    Act. An Organizational Unit must use such funds only for 9    the provision of special educational facilities and 10    services, as defined in Section 14-1.08 of this Code, and 11    must comply with any expenditure verification procedures 12    adopted by the State Board.13        (9) All Organizational Units in this State must submit 14    annual spending plans, as part of the budget submission 15    process, no later than October 31 of each year to the State 16    Board. The spending plan shall describe how each 17    Organizational Unit will utilize the Base Funding Minimum 18    and Evidence-Based Funding it receives from this State 19    under this Section with specific identification of the 20    intended utilization of Low-Income, English learner, and 21    special education resources. Additionally, the annual 22    spending plans of each Organizational Unit shall describe 23    how the Organizational Unit expects to achieve student 24    growth and how the Organizational Unit will achieve State 25    education goals, as defined by the State Board, and shall 26    indicate which stakeholder groups the Organizational Unit   HB1925- 68 -LRB104 09564 LNS 19627 b1    engaged with to inform its annual spending plans. The 2    State Superintendent may, from time to time, identify 3    additional requisites for Organizational Units to satisfy 4    when compiling the annual spending plans required under 5    this subsection (h). The format and scope of annual 6    spending plans shall be developed by the State 7    Superintendent and the State Board of Education. School 8    districts that serve students under Article 14C of this 9    Code shall continue to submit information as required 10    under Section 14C-12 of this Code. Annual spending plans 11    required under this subsection (h) shall be integrated 12    into annual school district budgets completed pursuant to 13    Section 17-1 or Section 34-43. Organizational Units that 14    do not submit a budget to the State Board shall be provided 15    with a separate planning template developed by the State 16    Board. The State Board shall create an Evidence-Based 17    Funding spending plan tool to make Evidence-Based Funding 18    spending plan data for each Organizational Unit available 19    on the State Board's website no later than December 31, 20    2025, with annual updates thereafter. The tool shall allow 21    for the selection and review of each Organizational Unit's 22    planned use of Evidence-Based Funding.23        (10) No later than January 1, 2018, the State 24    Superintendent shall develop a 5-year strategic plan for 25    all Organizational Units to help in planning for adequacy 26    funding under this Section. The State Superintendent shall   HB1925- 69 -LRB104 09564 LNS 19627 b1    submit the plan to the Governor and the General Assembly, 2    as provided in Section 3.1 of the General Assembly 3    Organization Act. The plan shall include recommendations 4    for: 5            (A) a framework for collaborative, professional, 6        innovative, and 21st century learning environments 7        using the Evidence-Based Funding model;8            (B) ways to prepare and support this State's 9        educators for successful instructional careers;10            (C) application and enhancement of the current 11        financial accountability measures, the approved State 12        plan to comply with the federal Every Student Succeeds 13        Act, and the Illinois Balanced Accountability Measures 14        in relation to student growth and elements of the 15        Evidence-Based Funding model; and16            (D) implementation of an effective school adequacy 17        funding system based on projected and recommended 18        funding levels from the General Assembly. 19        (11) On an annual basis, the State Superintendent must 20    recalibrate all of the following per pupil elements of the 21    Adequacy Target and applied to the formulas, based on the 22    study of average expenses and as reported in the most 23    recent annual financial report:24            (A) Gifted under subparagraph (M) of paragraph (2) 25        of subsection (b).26            (B) Instructional materials under subparagraph (O)   HB1925- 70 -LRB104 09564 LNS 19627 b1        of paragraph (2) of subsection (b).2            (C) Assessment under subparagraph (P) of paragraph 3        (2) of subsection (b).4            (D) Student activities under subparagraph (R) of 5        paragraph (2) of subsection (b).6            (E) Maintenance and operations under subparagraph 7        (S) of paragraph (2) of subsection (b).8            (F) Central office under subparagraph (T) of 9        paragraph (2) of subsection (b). 10    (i) Professional Review Panel. 11        (1) A Professional Review Panel is created to study 12    and review topics related to the implementation and effect 13    of Evidence-Based Funding, as assigned by a joint 14    resolution or Public Act of the General Assembly or a 15    motion passed by the State Board of Education. The Panel 16    must provide recommendations to and serve the Governor, 17    the General Assembly, and the State Board. The State 18    Superintendent or his or her designee must serve as a 19    voting member and chairperson of the Panel. The State 20    Superintendent must appoint a vice chairperson from the 21    membership of the Panel. The Panel must advance 22    recommendations based on a three-fifths majority vote of 23    Panel members present and voting. A minority opinion may 24    also accompany any recommendation of the Panel. The Panel 25    shall be appointed by the State Superintendent, except as 26    otherwise provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection (i)   HB1925- 71 -LRB104 09564 LNS 19627 b1    and include the following members: 2            (A) Two appointees that represent district 3        superintendents, recommended by a statewide 4        organization that represents district superintendents.5            (B) Two appointees that represent school boards, 6        recommended by a statewide organization that 7        represents school boards.8            (C) Two appointees from districts that represent 9        school business officials, recommended by a statewide 10        organization that represents school business 11        officials.12            (D) Two appointees that represent school 13        principals, recommended by a statewide organization 14        that represents school principals.15            (E) Two appointees that represent teachers, 16        recommended by a statewide organization that 17        represents teachers.18            (F) Two appointees that represent teachers, 19        recommended by another statewide organization that 20        represents teachers.21            (G) Two appointees that represent regional 22        superintendents of schools, recommended by 23        organizations that represent regional superintendents.24            (H) Two independent experts selected solely by the 25        State Superintendent.26            (I) Two independent experts recommended by public   HB1925- 72 -LRB104 09564 LNS 19627 b1        universities in this State.2            (J) One member recommended by a statewide 3        organization that represents parents.4            (K) Two representatives recommended by collective 5        impact organizations that represent major metropolitan 6        areas or geographic areas in Illinois.7            (L) One member from a statewide organization 8        focused on research-based education policy to support 9        a school system that prepares all students for 10        college, a career, and democratic citizenship. 11            (M) One representative from a school district 12        organized under Article 34 of this Code. 13        The State Superintendent shall ensure that the 14    membership of the Panel includes representatives from 15    school districts and communities reflecting the 16    geographic, socio-economic, racial, and ethnic diversity 17    of this State. The State Superintendent shall additionally 18    ensure that the membership of the Panel includes 19    representatives with expertise in bilingual education and 20    special education. Staff from the State Board shall staff 21    the Panel. 22        (2) In addition to those Panel members appointed by 23    the State Superintendent, 4 members of the General 24    Assembly shall be appointed as follows: one member of the 25    House of Representatives appointed by the Speaker of the 26    House of Representatives, one member of the Senate   HB1925- 73 -LRB104 09564 LNS 19627 b1    appointed by the President of the Senate, one member of 2    the House of Representatives appointed by the Minority 3    Leader of the House of Representatives, and one member of 4    the Senate appointed by the Minority Leader of the Senate. 5    There shall be one additional member appointed by the 6    Governor. All members appointed by legislative leaders or 7    the Governor shall be non-voting, ex officio members.8        (3) The Panel must study topics at the direction of 9    the General Assembly or State Board of Education, as 10    provided under paragraph (1). The Panel may also study the 11    following topics at the direction of the chairperson: 12            (A) The format and scope of annual spending plans 13        referenced in paragraph (9) of subsection (h) of this 14        Section.15            (B) The Comparable Wage Index under this Section.16            (C) Maintenance and operations, including capital 17        maintenance and construction costs.18            (D) "At-risk student" definition.19            (E) Benefits.20            (F) Technology.21            (G) Local Capacity Target.22            (H) Funding for Alternative Schools, Laboratory 23        Schools, safe schools, and alternative learning 24        opportunities programs.25            (I) Funding for college and career acceleration 26        strategies.  HB1925- 74 -LRB104 09564 LNS 19627 b1            (J) Special education investments. 2            (K) Early childhood investments, in collaboration 3        with the Illinois Early Learning Council.4        (4) (Blank). 5        (5) Within 5 years after the implementation of this 6    Section, and every 5 years thereafter, the Panel shall 7    complete an evaluative study of the entire Evidence-Based 8    Funding model, including an assessment of whether or not 9    the formula is achieving State goals. The Panel shall 10    report to the State Board, the General Assembly, and the 11    Governor on the findings of the study.12        (6) (Blank). 13        (7) To ensure that (i) the Adequacy Target calculation 14    under subsection (b) accurately reflects the needs of 15    students living in poverty or attending schools located in 16    areas of high poverty, (ii) racial equity within the 17    Evidence-Based Funding formula is explicitly explored and 18    advanced, and (iii) the funding goals of the formula 19    distribution system established under this Section are 20    sufficient to provide adequate funding for every student 21    and to fully fund every school in this State, the Panel 22    shall review the Essential Elements under paragraph (2) of 23    subsection (b). The Panel shall consider all of the 24    following in its review:25            (A) The financial ability of school districts to 26        provide instruction in a foreign language to every   HB1925- 75 -LRB104 09564 LNS 19627 b1        student and whether an additional Essential Element 2        should be added to the formula to ensure that every 3        student has access to instruction in a foreign 4        language.5            (B) The adult-to-student ratio for each Essential 6        Element in which a ratio is identified. The Panel 7        shall consider whether the ratio accurately reflects 8        the staffing needed to support students living in 9        poverty or who have traumatic backgrounds.10            (C) Changes to the Essential Elements that may be 11        required to better promote racial equity and eliminate 12        structural racism within schools.13            (D) The impact of investing $350,000,000 in 14        additional funds each year under this Section and an 15        estimate of when the school system will become fully 16        funded under this level of appropriation.17            (E) Provide an overview of alternative funding 18        structures that would enable the State to become fully 19        funded at an earlier date.20            (F) The potential to increase efficiency and to 21        find cost savings within the school system to expedite 22        the journey to a fully funded system.23            (G) The appropriate levels for reenrolling and 24        graduating high-risk high school students who have 25        been previously out of school. These outcomes shall 26        include enrollment, attendance, skill gains, credit   HB1925- 76 -LRB104 09564 LNS 19627 b1        gains, graduation or promotion to the next grade 2        level, and the transition to college, training, or 3        employment, with an emphasis on progressively 4        increasing the overall attendance.5            (H) The evidence-based or research-based practices 6        that are shown to reduce the gaps and disparities 7        experienced by African American students in academic 8        achievement and educational performance, including 9        practices that have been shown to reduce disparities 10        in disciplinary rates, drop-out rates, graduation 11        rates, college matriculation rates, and college 12        completion rates. 13        On or before December 31, 2021, the Panel shall report 14    to the State Board, the General Assembly, and the Governor 15    on the findings of its review. This paragraph (7) is 16    inoperative on and after July 1, 2022.17        (8) On or before April 1, 2024, the Panel must submit a 18    report to the General Assembly on annual adjustments to 19    Glenwood Academy's base-funding minimum in a similar 20    fashion to school districts under this Section. 21    (j) References. Beginning July 1, 2017, references in 22other laws to general State aid funds or calculations under 23Section 18-8.05 of this Code (now repealed) shall be deemed to 24be references to evidence-based model formula funds or 25calculations under this Section. 26(Source: P.A. 102-33, eff. 6-25-21; 102-197, eff. 7-30-21;   HB1925- 77 -LRB104 09564 LNS 19627 b1102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 102-699, eff. 4-19-22; 102-782, eff. 21-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-894, eff. 5-20-22; 103-8, 3eff. 6-7-23; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-175, eff. 6-30-23; 4103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-780, eff. 8-2-24; 103-802, eff. 51-1-25; revised 11-26-24.) 6    Section 90. The State Mandates Act is amended by adding 7Section 8.49 as follows: 8    (30 ILCS 805/8.49 new)9    Sec. 8.49. Exempt mandate. Notwithstanding Sections 6 and 108 of this Act, no reimbursement by the State is required for 11the implementation of any mandate created by this amendatory 12Act of the 104th General Assembly. 13    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 14becoming law.